Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.155

Fern Lodge maintenance account.

The Fern Lodge maintenance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the collection of rents for the Snohomish county long-term civil commitment facility known as Fern Lodge must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the ongoing maintenance and operational costs of Fern Lodge. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenses from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2024 c 168 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 168 ss 4-13: "(1) Sections 4 through 10 and 12 of this act take effect July 1, 2024.

(2) Section 11 of this act takes effect July 1, 2030.

(3) Section 13 of this act takes effect July 1, 2028." [ 2024 c 168 s 17.]